Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.211

Notice for hearing required prior to petitioning for judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by any final decision of the director must, before petitioning for judicial review, file with the director of the retirement system by mail or personally within sixty days from the day such decision was communicated to such person, a notice for a hearing. The notice of hearing shall set forth in full detail the grounds upon which such person considers such decision unjust or unlawful and shall include every issue to be considered, and it must contain a detailed statement of facts upon which such person relies in support thereof. Such persons shall be deemed to have waived all objections or irregularities concerning the matter on which such appeal is taken other than those specifically set forth in the notice of hearing or appearing in the records of the retirement system.

[ 1984 c 184 s 16; 1981 c 294 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 19. Formerly RCW 41.26.052, 41.26.210.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 184: See note following RCW 41.50.150.

Severability—1981 c 294: See note following RCW 41.26.115.